Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16A.91] HEALTHY AGING SUBCABINET. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; purpose and intent. new text end new text begin The Healthy Aging Subcabinet is established in Minnesota Management and Budget. The subcabinet is a distinct entity, separately identifiable from other state agencies and is dedicated to ensuring all people in Minnesota age with dignity and have equitable opportunities for the best possible health and well-being throughout the life-course. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Subcabinet purpose. new text end new text begin The purpose of the subcabinet is to: new text end new text begin (1) assist in the design of a statewide planning process for a Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan for an aging population; new text end new text begin (2) engage public participation in creating policy solutions for identified challenges and opportunities related to aging in communities and living in one's own home; new text end new text begin (3) identify opportunities within state government to improve quality of life for older adults and promote healthy aging for all people in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (4) serve as a resource to the legislature on policies and practices that will enhance the experience of aging for people living in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Director; Office of Healthy Aging; staffing; duties. new text end new text begin (a) The governor shall appoint a director to lead and oversee operations of the subcabinet, the Citizens' Engagement Council and establish an Office of Healthy Aging. The director shall serve as the chair of the Healthy Aging Subcabinet. The director must possess a background in public health, public policy, community engagement, and have a demonstrated knowledge of older adult abilities and needed supports when living at home or in the person's community. The director may have experience working with an aging population. The director's responsibilities at a minimum are to: new text end new text begin (1) lead and coordinate the duties of the Healthy Aging Subcabinet; new text end new text begin (2) initiate and conduct a planning process to develop the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan for aging in Minnesota communities; new text end new text begin (3) appoint members and support the Citizens' Engagement Council; new text end new text begin (4) ensure community discussions across public and private sectors and with Tribal governments and the Indian Affairs Council to inform policy recommendations for the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan; new text end new text begin (5) ensure the perspectives of older adults, caregivers, health care and service providers, and advocacy organizations regarding community development that is needed to support older adults living at home and aging in the community are reflected in the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan; and new text end new text begin (6) explore initiatives that enhance opportunities for an aging adult, regardless of age, income, or ability level, to live in the adult's own home and community if desired and if safe. new text end new text begin (b) The director may secure professional development and training opportunities to promote community development initiatives that address aging-related issues and support the Healthy Aging Subcabinet. new text end new text begin (c) The director may hire and compensate out of available funds additional staff as necessary to support the office and conduct the planning process. Staff members shall possess relevant expertise and experience in areas such as aging services, policy analysis, community health, and community development and engagement. The director and full-time staff shall be eligible for the Minnesota State Retirement System. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Subcabinet membership. new text end new text begin The subcabinet membership shall consist of agency leads representing state agencies that administer policies that impact aging Minnesotans. The director, subcabinet members, and Citizens' Engagement Council shall assist in development and recommendations for the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Subcabinet duties. new text end new text begin The director of the subcabinet shall lead the Citizens' Engagement Council members in the following duties: new text end new text begin (1) integrate aging-related considerations into state agency planning, decision-making, and measurable outcomes for service delivery processes; new text end new text begin (2) promote the adoption of evidence-based approaches and policies in supporting healthy aging across public and private sectors; new text end new text begin (3) ensure agencies conduct community engagement to inform strategic plans for each agency; new text end new text begin (4) identify federal and state funding for programs currently dedicated to address the negative impact of social determinants of health and well-being for Minnesotans and those that would significantly benefit from community strategies that prevent or delay disability and that enable quality-of-life outcomes throughout the life span; new text end new text begin (5) identify areas of potential savings through economic and community development and resource planning for an aging demographic; new text end new text begin (6) evaluate the impact on healthy aging of current aging related initiatives in public and private sectors including housing, transit and workforce programs designed for older adults, and community health efforts in order to inform the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan; new text end new text begin (7) coordinate with local and state agencies and Tribal Nations to conduct an analysis of the health care delivery system for oral health, chronic and acute health conditions, and palliative and end-of-life care to determine areas of access problems throughout Minnesota; new text end new text begin (8) with relevant state agencies and Tribal Nations, analyze the extent of family caregiving in private and public sectors to determine the need for greater support through aging policies initiated in private and public sectors; new text end new text begin (9) with the ombudsman for long-term care, evaluate the oversight process of long-term care facilities, assisted living residences, and home-care agencies that ensure public safety and accountability; new text end new text begin (10) develop a transparency policy that tracks the use of government funding for long-term care to ensure state funding is used as intended; new text end new text begin (11) monitor and evaluate strategies and findings for progress reports during the planning process to be posted on the subcabinet's website; and new text end new text begin (12) with the ombudsman for long-term care, evaluate the need for additional long-term care services and training and recruitment of long-term care providers throughout the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Citizens' Engagement Council; public engagement. new text end new text begin (a) The Office of Healthy Aging will establish a Citizens' Engagement Council composed of 20 diverse members from different geographic regions and demographic groups, including older adults, caregivers, elder advocates, the Minnesota area agencies on aging, Tribal Nations, county agencies, nonprofit services, and business sectors. The purpose of the council is to: new text end new text begin (1) ensure the voices and perspectives of older adults are included in the recommended initiatives and policies for implementing the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan; new text end new text begin (2) provide feedback on current aging-related programs and services, identifying areas for improvements and innovations; and new text end new text begin (3) provide ongoing input, advice, and strategies for the planning process to engage older Minnesotans and families. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the council may be compensated under section 15.059 for council activities. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Discretionary powers. new text end new text begin The office may apply for and receive grants from public and private foundations and issue contracts and grants. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Public awareness. new text end new text begin In order to promote public engagement, the Office of Healthy Aging shall maintain a website and publish annual reports about the work of the office. The office shall also share on its website ideas for how Minnesotans can become involved with and informed on aging issues. By use of this medium, the office shall gather ideas from the public on needed programs for healthy aging in the community. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan. new text end new text begin The Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan shall include recommendations from citizens and council members that support older Minnesotans and their contributions, and their health care needs as follows: new text end new text begin (1) community-based initiatives that support living in one's own home and community if desired, regardless of age, income, or ability level, and as safely, independently, and comfortably as possible; new text end new text begin (2) community-based initiatives with public and private sector funding that provide older adults the choice to remain in and contribute to their communities with needed supports including access to health care, independent housing options, access to food, opportunities to socialize, innovative residential options for long-term care, and safe and affordable transportation; new text end new text begin (3) public policies that recommend systemwide improvements for safe and affordable housing options and transportation, innovative market-rate housing options, removal of employment barriers and increased opportunities for an aging workforce, outdoor recreational opportunities, broadband communications, and health care that includes mental health and oral health; new text end new text begin (4) public policies that address the current and future demand for home care, assisted living and skilled nursing facilities, and innovations for community-based long-term care services; workforce training, recruitment and employment opportunities throughout Minnesota; and professional education opportunities for long-term care providers; new text end new text begin (5) public and private sector resource management policies that would implement community health strategies to address social determinants of health and well-being; new text end new text begin (6) state agencies' strategic plans that drive innovations for healthy aging in communities across the lifespan; new text end new text begin (7) ongoing aging policy coordination and oversight within state and county agencies and in coordination with Tribal Nations, local communities, and the private sector; new text end new text begin (8) measures to ensure ongoing monitoring and evaluation of the impact of healthy aging policies and programs in order to make improvements and recommend further innovations; new text end new text begin (9) recommendations for full implementation of the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan that includes administration, staffing, and appropriations; and new text end new text begin (10) measures to evaluate the success and impact of the Minnesota Healthy Aging Plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin By January 15 of each year, the office must submit a report to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over health aging policy and funding detailing the activities of the office for the preceding year with legislative recommendations for the coming year. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HEALTHY AGING SUBCABINET.new text end new text begin $1,700,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,700.000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget dedicated to implement provisions of this act. new text end